Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,130.01
Historical license plates; application; form; contents.

The application under section 60-3,130 shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the department. The form shall contain (1) a description of the vehicle owned and sought to be registered, including the make, body type, model, vehicle identification number, and year of manufacture, (2) a description of any vehicle owned by the applicant and registered by him or her with regular license plates and used for regular transportation, which description shall include make, body type, model, vehicle identification number, year of manufacture, and the Nebraska registration number assigned to the vehicle, and (3) an affidavit sworn to by the vehicle owner that the historical vehicle is being collected, preserved, restored, and maintained by the applicant as a hobby and not for the general use of the vehicle for the same purposes and under the same circumstances as other motor vehicles of the same type.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 25.